Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1321
Foster Care
Review Office Cash Fund; created;
use; investment.

There is hereby created the Foster
Care Review Office Cash Fund. The fund
shall be administered by the Foster
Care Review Office. The office shall
remit revenue from the following sources to the State Treasurer for credit
to the fund:

(1) Registration and other fees received for training, seminars,
or conferences fully or partially sponsored or hosted by the office;

(2) Payments to offset printing, postage, and other expenses
for books, documents, or other materials printed or published by the office; and

(3) Money received by the office as gifts, grants, reimbursements,
or appropriations from any source intended for the purposes of the fund.

The fund shall be used for the administration of the Foster
Care Review Office. The State Treasurer shall transfer
any funds in the Foster Care Review Board Cash Fund on July 1, 2012, to the
Foster Care Review Office Cash Fund. Any money in the fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant
to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1194, § 9;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 38;

Laws 2012, LB998, § 16.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.